Nebraska, session 109, LB1188.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1188 LB1188
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 76-3702, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
76-3702 For purposes of the Foreign-owned Real Estate National
Security Act:
(1) Foreign corporation means a corporation incorporated under the
laws of a jurisdiction outside of the United States that would be a
business corporation if incorporated under the laws of this state. A
corporation incorporated in any state or territory of the United States
or territory of any Indian tribe of the United States is not a foreign
corporation;
(2) Foreign government means a government other than the federal
government of the United States, the government of any territory or
possession of the United States, or the government of any state,
political subdivision of a state, or Indian tribe;
(3) Indian tribe means an Indian tribe or band which is recognized
by federal law or formally acknowledged by the state;
(4) Nonresident alien means any human being who:
(a) Is not a citizen of the United States;
(b) Is not a national of the United States;
(c) Is not a lawful permanent resident of the United States; and
(d) Has not been physically present in the United States for at
least one hundred eighty-three days during a three-year period that
includes the current year and the two years immediately preceding the
current year;
(5) Person means a human being, corporation, business trust, estate,
trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint
venture, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial
entity; and
(6) Restricted entity means:
(a) Any person identified on the sanctions lists maintained by the
Office of Foreign Assets Control of the United States Department of the
-2-

LB1188 LB1188
2026 2026
Treasury as such sanctions lists existed on January 1, 2026 2025; or
(b) Any person or foreign government determined by the United States
Secretary of Commerce to have engaged in a long-term pattern or serious
instances of conduct significantly adverse to the national security of
the United States pursuant to 15 C.F.R. 791.4, as such regulation existed
on February 7, 2025.
Sec. 2. Section 76-3703, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
76-3703 (1) Except as provided in the Foreign-owned Real Estate
National Security Act, a nonresident alien, foreign corporation, or
foreign government, or an agent, trustee, or fiduciary thereof:
(a) Shall not purchase, acquire title to, or take any real estate or
any leasehold interest extending for a period for more than five years or
any other greater interest less than fee in any real estate in this state
by descent, devise, purchase or otherwise on or after January 1, 2025;
and
(b) Shall be in compliance with the federal Agricultural Foreign
Investment Disclosure Act of 1978, 7 U.S.C. 3501 et seq., with respect to
any real estate in Nebraska.
(2) Except as provided in the Foreign-owned Real Estate National
Security Act, a restricted entity, nonresident alien, foreign
corporation, foreign government, or an agent, trustee, or fiduciary
thereof, who on or after January 1, 2025, purchases, acquires title to,
or takes any real estate or any leasehold interest in violation of the
Foreign-owned Real Estate National Security Act shall be subject to
divestment as prescribed under section 76-3712.
(3) Any person, nonresident alien, foreign corporation, or foreign
government, or agent, trustee, or fiduciary thereof, of an excepted real
estate foreign state as determined by the Committee on Foreign Investment
in the United States pursuant to 31 C.F.R. 802.1001(a) and 802.214, as
such regulations existed on January 1, 2025, is exempt from the Foreign-
-3-

LB1188 LB1188
2026 2026
owned Real Estate National Security Act except for any restricted entity,
or agent, trustee, or fiduciary thereof.
(4) The State of Nebraska and any political subdivision thereof
shall be prohibited from owning any interest in real estate in an
adversary nation as defined in section 4-203.
Sec. 3. Original sections 76-3702 and 76-3703, Revised Statutes
Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
-4-